Maine, session 132, LD202.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §8301-A, sub-§1-A, ¶C, as amended by PL 2021, c. 35, §17, is
further amended to read:
C. "Family child care provider" means a person who provides day care in that person's
home on a regular basis, for consideration, for 3 4 to 12 children under 13 years of age
who are not the children of the provider or who are not residing in the provider's home.
If a provider is caring for children living in that provider's home and is caring for no
more than 2 3 other children, or 4 other children if at least 2 of the children are siblings,
and no more than 3 of the total number of children in the provider's care are under 2
years of age, the provider is not required to be licensed as a family child care provider.
Page 1 - 132LR0777(03)